Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,168.02
Federal disqualification; effect.

Beginning September 30, 2005, any federal disqualification of a Nebraska licensed operator imposed in accordance with 49 C.F.R. 383.52 transmitted by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration to the director shall become part of the operator's record maintained by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 18.